Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-831
Defective bridge; notice to county board.

Whenever any highway or bridge in any county shall be out of repair, or unsafe for travel, any three citizens or taxpayers of the state may notify the member of the county board of the district within which such road or bridge is situated, in writing, setting forth a description of the road or bridge and the defects therein.

Laws 1889, c. 7, § 1, p. 77;

R.S.1913, § 2992;

C.S.1922, § 2743;

C.S.1929, § 39-829;

R.S.1943, § 39-831.

Repairs contemplated by this section are such as may be made at once and without considerable cost. State ex rel. Heil v. Jakubowski, 151 Neb. 471, 38 N.W.2d 26 (1949).